Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. In General

§ 20-2-101.
Void and voidable marriages defined; annulments.

Marriages contracted in Wyoming are void without any decree of divorce:

When either party has a husband or wife living at the time of contracting the marriage;

When either party is mentally incompetent at the time of contracting the marriage;

When the parties stand in the relation to each other of parent and child, grandparent and grandchild, brother and sister of half or whole blood, uncle and niece, aunt and nephew, or first cousins, whether either party is illegitimate. This paragraph does not apply to persons not related by consanguinity.

A marriage is voidable if solemnized when either party was under the age of legal consent unless a judge gave consent, if they separated during nonage and did not cohabit together afterwards, or if the consent of one (1) of the parties was obtained by force or fraud and there was no subsequent voluntary cohabitation of the parties.

Either party may file a petition in the district court of the county where the parties or one (1) of them reside, to annul a marriage for reasons stated in subsections (a) and (b) of this section and proceedings shall be held as in the case of a petition for divorce except as otherwise provided. Upon due proof the marriage shall be declared void by a decree of nullity.

An action to annul a marriage on the ground that one of the parties was under the age of legal consent provided by W.S. 20-1-102(a) may be filed by the parent or guardian entitled to the custody of the minor. The marriage may not be annulled on the application of a party who was of the age of legal consent at the time of the marriage nor when it appears that the parties, after they had attained the age of consent, had freely cohabited as man and wife.

An action to annul a marriage on the grounds of mental incompetency may be commenced on behalf of a mentally incompetent person by his guardian or next friend. A mentally incompetent person restored to competency may maintain an action of annulment, but no decree may be granted if the parties freely cohabited as husband and wife after restoration of competency.

An action to annul a marriage on the grounds of physical incapacity may only be maintained by the injured party against the party whose incapacity is alleged and may only be commenced within two (2) years from the solemnization of the marriage.

All decrees of annulment may include provisions for the custody and support of children pursuant to this article, W.S.

20-2-201

through

20-2-204

and

20-2-301

through

20-2-315

and for the division of property pursuant to W.S.

20-2-114

.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, §§ 1 to 3, 26; R.S. 1887, §§ 1567 to 1569, 1592; R.S. 1899, §§ 2981 to 2984; C.S. 1910, §§ 3917 to 3920; C.S. 1920, §§ 4983 to 4986; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 79; R.S. 1931, §§ 35-101 to 35-104; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5901 to 3-5903, 3-5927; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-32 to 20-35; Laws 1975, ch. 61, § 2; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-101

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “20-2-114” for “20-2-131” in (g).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

The bracketed section reference has been inserted in subsection (g) as the apparent intended reference.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Bigamous marriage not validated by cohabitation after death of first spouse. —

Where the first husband died after the wife had married for a second time, subsequent continued cohabitation between her and the “second husband” did not validate their illegal marriage. In re Reeves' Estate, 58 Wyo. 432, 133 P.2d 503,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of annulment of marriage on rights arising out of act of or transactions between parties prior thereto, 2 ALR2d 637.

Avoidance of procreation of children as grounds for annulment, 4 ALR2d 227.

Validity of marriage as affected by intention of the party that it should be only a matter of form or jest, 14 ALR2d 624.

Antenuptial knowledge relating to alleged grounds as barring right to annulment; physical or mental incapacity; immoral conduct before marriage; prior marriage; marriage barred by terms of divorce decree or statute, 15 ALR2d 706.

What constitutes duress sufficient to warrant annulment of marriage, 16 ALR2d 1430.

Refusal of sexual intercourse as ground for annulment, 28 ALR2d 499.

Applicability, to annulment actions, of residence requirements of divorce statutes, 32 ALR2d 734.

Right to attack validity of marriage after death of parties thereto, 47 ALR2d 1393.

Limitation of actions for annulment of marriage, 52 ALR2d 1163.

Right to allowance of permanent alimony in connection with decree of annulment, 54 ALR2d 1410.

What constitutes intoxication sufficient to warrant annulment of marriage, 57 ALR2d 1250.

Concealed premarital unchastity or parenthood as ground of divorce or annulment, 64 ALR2d 742.

Mental incompetency of defendant at time of action as precluding annulment of marriage, 97 ALR2d 483.

Concealment or misrepresentation as to previous marriage or divorce as ground for annulment of marriage, 15 ALR3d 759.

What constitutes mistake in the identity of one of the parties to warrant annulment of marriage, 50 ALR3d 1295.

Incapacity for sexual intercourse as ground for annulment, 52 ALR3d 589.

Right to allowance of permanent alimony in connection with decree of annulment, 81 ALR3d 281.

Recovery for services rendered by persons living in apparent relation of husband and wife without express agreement for compensation, 94 ALR3d 552.

Enforceability of agreement requiring spouse's cooperation in obtaining religious bill of divorce, 29 ALR4th 746.

Prior institution of annulment proceedings or other attack on validity of one's marriage as barring or estopping one from entitlement to property rights as surviving spouse, 31 ALR4th 1190.

Court's authority to award temporary alimony or suit money in action for divorce, separate maintenance, or alimony where the existence of a valid marriage is contested, 34 ALR4th 814.

Homosexuality, transvestism and similar sexual practices as grounds for annulment of marriage, 68 ALR4th 1069.

Failure to disclose extent or value of property owned as ground for avoiding premarital contract, 3 ALR5th 394.

Power of incompetent spouse's guardian or representative to sue for granting or vacation of divorce or annulment of marriage, or to make compromise or settlement in such suit, 32 ALR5th 673.

Homosexuality as ground for divorce, 96 ALR5th 83.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 5.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 20-2-102.
Petition by spouse for support.

When the husband and wife are living separately, or when they are living together but one (1) spouse does not support the other spouse or children within his means, and no proceeding for divorce is pending, the other spouse or the department of family services may institute a proceeding for support. No less than five (5) days after notice is personally served upon the nonsupporting spouse, the court may hear the petition and grant such order concerning the support of the spouse or children as it might grant were it based on a proceeding for divorce. If the nonsupporting spouse cannot be personally served within this state but has property within the jurisdiction of the court, or debts owing to him, the court may order such constructive service as appears sufficient and proper and may cause an attachment of the property. Upon completion of constructive service the court may grant relief as if personal service was had.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 1584; R.S. 1899, § 3001; C.S. 1910, § 3937; C.S. 1920, § 5003; R.S. 1931, § 35-121; C.S. 1945, § 3-5919; Laws 1951, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 20-36; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-102

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see chapter 4 of this title.

Maintenance pending hearing. —

On writ of error to a decree allowing separate maintenance, the question of the wife's right to maintenance pending hearing on the writ will be postponed until the final hearing, where no application for such maintenance was made in the trial court, and the wife is earning sufficient for her support. Brown v. Brown, 22 Wyo. 92, 135 P. 801,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1913).

Jurisdiction. —

In an action seeking a divorce and the custody and support for child, divorce was denied, but the court retained jurisdiction of the remainder of the action and legally entered a decree awarding plaintiff custody of the child and judgment for support money therefor. Urbach v. Urbach, 52 Wyo. 207, 73 P.2d 953,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1937).

In proceedings under this section, neither the court, the judge nor the court commissioner had jurisdiction to make a permanent and final adjudication of the property rights between the parties. Brown v. Brown, 23 Wyo. 1, 146 P. 231,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1915).

Contract, whereby the husband agrees to pay the wife one-half of proceeds from a sale of homestead, cannot be enforced by proceedings under this section. Brown v. Brown, 23 Wyo. 1, 146 P. 231,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1915).

Powers of court. —

The grant of power to provide for custody and care of children in connection with a divorce decree, does not abrogate equitable powers of the court existing independent thereof, nor does it limit exercise of the power granted in another statute under somewhat different circumstances. Urbach v. Urbach, 52 Wyo. 207, 73 P.2d 953,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1937).

Power to adjudicate property rights limited. —

In the absence of such a statute as § 20-2-106(c), a court in a separate maintenance action similar to this section does not have the power to adjudicate property rights of the parties or to divide their property. Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Notice. —

Notice of a longer time than provided for by statute does not make the proceeding invalid, nor can the defendant complain, as he had a better opportunity to be heard than in a summary proceeding, and was not prejudiced. Urbach v. Urbach, 52 Wyo. 207, 73 P.2d 953,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1937).

Duty of defendant to raise defenses. —

In separate maintenance action it was duty of defendant to interpose defense that his wife deserted him willfully and his failure to do so negated any such misbehavior up to date of decree. Davis v. Davis, 56 Wyo. 524, 111 P.2d 124,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1941).

In gross award unauthorized. —

This section does not authorize the award of a sum in gross for the wife's maintenance. Brown v. Brown, 23 Wyo. 1, 146 P. 231,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1915).

Effect of court finding for wife in separate maintenance action. —

In a proceeding filed by wife for separate maintenance wherein the husband files a cross petition for a divorce, a decree of the trial court finding generally in favor of the wife and for an allowance for support of wife is not a final order, but is an order for alimony pendente lite. Such decree does not determine the merits of the divorce especially when the trial court sustains a motion by the wife to strike the cross petition. Holmes v. Holmes, 66 Wyo. 317, 211 P.2d 946,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1949).

Husband to pay wife's attorney fees. —

Wife living apart from husband pursuant to separate maintenance decree held entitled to payment of attorney's fee on husband's appeal from judgment denying him a divorce on ground of willful desertion. Davis v. Davis, 56 Wyo. 524, 111 P.2d 124,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1941).

Supreme court may compel husband on his prosecuting a writ of error to a judgment for separate maintenance, rendered under this section, to pay his wife a reasonable sum for attorney's fees in the supreme court. Brown v. Brown, 22 Wyo. 92, 135 P. 801,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1913).

Husband is not liable for contempt for failure to pay arrears

due under order for temporary alimony entered in a proceeding for separate maintenance where proceeding has been finally and definitely determined by a decree rendered on the merits. Holmes v. Holmes, 66 Wyo. 317, 211 P.2d 946,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1949).

Law reviews. —

See “Enforcement of Civil Liability for Nonsupport in the State of Wyoming,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Defenses available to husband in civil suit by wife for support, 10 ALR2d 466, 36 ALR4th 502.

Nonresident wife's right to maintain action for separate maintenance or alimony alone against resident husband, 36 ALR2d 1369.

Allowance of alimony in lump sum in action for separate maintenance without divorce, 61 ALR2d 946.

Property rights of spouses in action for separate maintenance or support without divorce, 74 ALR2d 316.

Husband's death as affecting periodic payment provision of separation agreement, 5 ALR4th 1153.

Necessity, in action against husband for necessaries furnished wife, or proving husband's failure to provide necessities, 19 ALR4th 432.

Excessiveness or adequacy of amount of money awarded as separate maintenance, alimony, or support for spouse without absolute divorce, 26 ALR4th 1190.

Order awarding temporary support or living expenses upon separation of unmarried partners pending contract action based on services relating to personal relationship, 35 ALR4th 409.

Reconciliation as affecting decree for limited divorce, separation, alimony, separate maintenance or spousal support, 36 ALR4th 502.

Divorce and separation: attributing undisclosed income to parent or spouse for purposes of making child or spousal support award, 70 ALR4th 173.

§ 20-2-103.
Petition to affirm marriage.

When the validity of any marriage is denied by either party, the other party may file a petition to affirm the marriage. Upon due proof of the validity thereof, it shall be declared valid by a decree of the court which is conclusive upon all persons concerned.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1570; R.S. 1899, § 2987; C.S. 1910, § 3923; C.S. 1920, § 4989; R.S. 1931, § 35-107; C.S. 1945, § 3-5904; W.S. 1957, § 20-37; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-103

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

§ 20-2-104.
Causes for divorce generally; venue generally.

A divorce may be decreed by the district court of the county in which either party resides on the complaint of the aggrieved party on the grounds of irreconcilable differences in the marital relationship.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1571; R.S. 1899, § 2988; C.S. 1910, § 3924; C.S. 1920, § 4990; R.S. 1931, § 35-108; C.S. 1945, § 3-5905; W.S. 1957, § 20-38; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-104

.

Venue.—

To the extent that a district court dismissed a divorce action on the basis of improper statutory venue, the court erred because the husband filed the divorce complaint in the court in accordance with the applicable venue statute, as the husband lived in the county where the court was located and the wife did not live in Wyoming. Saunders v. Saunders, 2019 WY 82, 445 P.3d 991,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2019).

Postnuptial agreement's provision stipulating for divorce by simple termination of “contract” was void

as against public policy, since dissolution of a marriage requires a decree of divorce by a court with appropriate jurisdiction. Combs v. Sherry-Combs, 865 P.2d 50,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1993).

The statutory grounds of divorce are exclusive,

the courts having authority in this field to do only that which is prescribed by the legislature. Logan v. Logan, 396 P.2d 198,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1964).

Grounds for child custody support, alimony, and property division not modified. —

The enactment of this section, which does no more than provide no-fault grounds for divorce, does not modify the traditional existing grounds for determining child custody support, alimony, attorney fees and division of property under §

20-2-114

.Grosskopf v. Grosskopf, 677 P.2d 814,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1984).

Trial court has discretion in determining sufficiency of grounds. —

Some latitude for the exercise of discretion is permitted to the trial court in determining the sufficiency of grounds for divorce. Gill v. Gill, 363 P.2d 86,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1961).

Court did not err in unequivocally granting a wife a divorce from the husband where neither party requested special findings, thus, the court was not required to state its findings concerning which party was aggrieved and why, the court signed and dated the divorce decree two days before both the default and the divorce decree were entered, and no authority required the court to postpone the divorce proceedings pending the clerk’s entry of default on the husband’s counterclaim. Commonwealth ex rel. Tinder v. Werner, 280 S.W.2d 214, 1955 Ky. LEXIS 152 (Ky. 1955).

And its finding will stand in the absence of abuse of discretion.

Gill v. Gill, 363 P.2d 86,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1961); Brydon v. Brydon, 365 P.2d 55,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1961).

“Spouse abuse.” —

Reference to “spouse abuse” in former § 20-2-113(a) was applicable to non-marital domestic relationships. Cobb v. Cobb, 2 P.3d 578,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. May 23, 2000).

Jurisdiction over same-sex divorce action. —

District court had subject-matter jurisdiction pursuant to Wyo. Const. art. 5, §§ 1, 10 and this section over a divorce action involving a same-sex couple legally married in Canada. Recognizing the marriage under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-1-111

for this limited purpose was not inconsistent with the definition of marriage in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-1-101

.
Christiansen v. Christiansen, 2011 WY 90, 253 P.3d 153,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2011).

Lack of findings on irreconcilable differences did not deprive
court of subject matter jurisdiction. —

District court's
failure to make findings on irreconcilable differences or equitable
property distribution did not deprive the court of subject matter
jurisdiction because (1) the applicable statutes did not so provide,
and (2) nothing showed the court usurped power the court did not have
or extended jurisdiction beyond the court's authority. Linch v. Linch, 2015 WY 141, 361 P.3d 308,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2015).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Divorce Mediation: An Innovative Approach to Family Dispute Resolution,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 693 (1983).

For article, “The Fault Factor in No-Fault Divorce and Equitable Distribution: Some Suggestions for Change in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 133 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reconciliation as affecting separation agreement or decree, 35 ALR2d 707, 36 ALR4th 502.

What amounts to incompatibility or inability of parties to live together within statutes relating to substantive grounds for divorce, 58 ALR2d 1218.

Power of court to grant absolute divorce to both spouses upon showing of mutual fault, 13 ALR3d 1364.

Retrospective effect of statute prescribing grounds of divorce, 23 ALR3d 626.

Validity, construction and effect of “no-fault” divorce statutes providing for dissolution of marriage upon finding that relationship is no longer viable, 55 ALR3d 581, 86 ALR3d 1116.

Refusal of sexual intercourse as justifying divorce or separation, 82 ALR3d 660.

Transvestism or transsexualism of spouse as justifying divorce, 82 ALR3d 725.

Insanity as defense to divorce or separation suit — post-1950 cases, 67 ALR4th 277.

Doctrine of forum non conveniens: Assumption or denial of jurisdiction of action involving matrimonial dispute, 55 ALR5th 647.

Homosexuality as ground for divorce, 96 ALR5th 83.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice §§ 4.01, 4.02, 4.03, 20.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 20-2-105.
Divorce action for insanity; when permitted; conditions to bringing action; liability for support.

A divorce may be granted when either party has become incurably insane and the insane person has been confined in a mental hospital of this state or of another state or territory for at least two (2) years immediately preceding the commencement of the action for divorce.

Upon the filing of a verified complaint showing that a cause of action exists under this section, the district court shall appoint some person to act as guardian of the insane person in the action. The summons and complaint in the action shall be served upon the defendant by delivering a copy of the summons and complaint to the guardian and to the county attorney of the county in which the action is brought.

The county attorney upon whom the summons and complaint is served shall appear for and defend the defendant in the action. No divorce shall be granted under this section except in the presence of the county attorney.

In any action brought under this section, the district courts possess all the powers relative to the payment of alimony, the distribution of property and the care, custody and maintenance of the children of the parties as in other actions for divorce.

Costs in the action, as well as the actual expenses of the county attorney and the expenses and fees of the guardian, shall be paid by the plaintiff. The expenses of the county attorney and expenses and fees of the guardian shall be fixed and allowed by the court, and the court may make such order as to the payment of fees and expenses as may seem proper.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 16, §§ 1 to 5; R.S. 1931, §§ 35-134 to 35-138; Laws 1943, ch. 56, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5935 to 3-5939; Laws 1949, ch. 28, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-39 to 20-43; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-105

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1921, ch. 16, § 6, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insanity as affecting right to divorce or separation on other grounds, 19 ALR2d 144.

Insanity as substantive ground of divorce or separation, 24 ALR2d 873.

Insanity as defense to divorce or separation suit — post-1950 cases, 67 ALR4th 277.

Power of incompetent spouse's guardian or representative to sue for granting or vacation of divorce or annulment of marriage, or to make compromise or settlement in such suit, 32 ALR5th 673.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 20.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 20-2-106.
Judicial separation; procedure; powers of court; defenses.

When circumstances are such that grounds for a divorce exist, the aggrieved party may institute a proceeding by complaint in the same manner as if petitioner were seeking a decree of divorce, but praying instead to be allowed to live separate and apart from the offending party.

No separation by decree entered hereunder shall be grounds for a divorce on the grounds of desertion or two (2) year separation unless those grounds existed at the time of petitioning for judicial separation. A decree of divorce may be granted after the decree of judicial separation is entered upon proper grounds arising thereafter.

The court may make such orders as appear just, including custody of the children, provision for support, disposition of the properties of the parties, alimony, restraint of one (1) or both spouses during litigation and restraint of disposition of property. The court may impose a time limitation on the order or render a perpetual separation. The parties may at any time move the court to be discharged from the order.

All defenses available in an action for divorce are available under this section.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 122, §§ 1 to 4; 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-106

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

In the 1977 revision of title 20, provisions for divorce on the grounds of desertion or two year separation, referred to in subsection (b), were omitted. The revision also omitted defenses available in an action for divorce, referred to in subsection (d).

Differences between action for judicial separation and absolute divorce. —

In an action for judicial separation, the grounds which base a limited decree are preserved for a later action of absolute divorce and the parties have the right to have the decree discharged. Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Effect of subsection (c) in separate maintenance action. —

In the absence of subsection (c) of this section, a court in a separate maintenance action similar to §

20-2-102

does not have the power to adjudicate property rights of the parties or to divide their property. Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Section does not specifically provide authority to award attorney's fees.

Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Implied discretion to allow attorney's fees. —

With the broad authority given the court in the judicial separation law, the same discretion to allow attorney's fees allowed under §

20-2-111

would be implied. Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Provision of decree held not award of attorney fees. —

Provision of decree ordering husband to pay $8,000 indebtedness to wife's father, which amount included the $5,000 attorney fees paid by the wife, was part of the equitable division of property, not an award of attorney fees. Prentice v. Prentice, 568 P.2d 883,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 280

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980); Ellison v. Walter ex rel. Walter, 834 P.2d 680,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Fault Factor in No-Fault Divorce and Equitable Distribution: Some Suggestions for Change in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 133 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Husband's death as affecting periodic payment provision of separation agreement, 5 ALR4th 1153.

Divorce and separation: method of valuation of life insurance policies in connection with trial court's division of property, 54 ALR4th 1203.

Insanity as defense to divorce or separation suit — post-1950 cases, 67 ALR4th 277.

Divorce and separation: effect of court order prohibiting sale or transfer of property on party's right to change beneficiary of insurance policy, 68 ALR4th 929.

§ 20-2-107.
Residential requirements generally for divorce.

No divorce shall be granted unless one of the parties has resided in this state for sixty (60) days immediately preceding the time of filing the complaint, or the marriage was solemnized in this state and one of the parties has resided in this state from the time of the marriage until the filing of the complaint.

A married person who at the time of filing a complaint for divorce resides in this state is a resident although his spouse may reside elsewhere.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, §§ 6, 33; R.S. 1887, §§ 1572, 1599; R.S. 1899, §§ 2989, 3013; Laws 1901, ch. 2, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 3925, 3949; C.S. 1920, §§ 4991, 5015; R.S. 1931, §§ 35-109, 35-133; Laws 1935, ch. 29, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5907, 3-5934; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-48, 20-49; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-107

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3; 2017 ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “one of the parties” for “the plaintiff” twice.

Jurisdiction based on domicile. —

The doctrine of matrimonial domicile as the basis of jurisdiction to grant a divorce has been replaced by the view that “unitary domicile” or the domicile of either spouse is the basis of jurisdiction in such actions. Clauss v. Clauss, 459 P.2d 369,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1969).

Domicile question of law and fact. —

Whether a person has a domicile or residence in a particular place within the meaning of this section is a question of law and of fact determined from the facts and circumstances of each particular case. Millar v. Millar, 369 P.2d 207,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1962).

Indefinite stay and home in state. —

In order that the court may have jurisdiction to grant a divorce to the plaintiff his residence in this state must have been for the purpose of remaining here indefinitely and his residence must be with the bona fide intention of making Wyoming his home. Millar v. Millar, 369 P.2d 207,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1962).

Domicile not relinquished until new one established. —

Once a domicile is established, it is not relinquished until a new domicile is in fact established. Clauss v. Clauss, 459 P.2d 369,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1969).

Jurisdiction is determined by plaintiff's residence at the time of filing the petition, and it is immaterial where one afterwards establishes one's residence. Duxstad v. Duxstad, 17 Wyo. 411, 100 P. 112,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1909).

Woman plaintiff suing for divorce who had residence in Wyoming but who when she needed care went to her parents' home in Nebraska temporarily, though not intending to return to live with her husband, had not lost her residence in Wyoming at time of filing her petition less than two months later, and the district court had jurisdiction of her divorce action. Duxstad v. Duxstad, 17 Wyo. 411, 100 P. 112,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1909).

Failure to allege residential basis for jurisdiction. —

Failure to
allege a residential basis for a district court's jurisdiction in
a divorce did not deprive the court of subject matter jurisdiction
because it was undisputed that a former husband satisfied those requirements. Linch v. Linch, 2015 WY 141, 361 P.3d 308,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2015).

Acquisition of new domicile. —

In order to acquire a new domicile, a person must voluntarily disassociate himself from his present domicile, take up a permanent residence elsewhere, and intend to live and reside in the new residence for an indefinite period of time. Clauss v. Clauss, 459 P.2d 369,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1969).

Estoppel from challenging decree. —

Former husband was estopped from challenging the validity of a divorce decree based on his claim that the wife was not a resident of Wyoming when she filed the action because the decree carried a prima facie presumption of jurisdictional regularity, the wife made a prima facie showing of residence, and both parties had remarried and had children in reliance upon the validity of the decree. McDougall v. McDougall, 961 P.2d 382,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1998).

Husband was estopped from denying validity of divorce decree on grounds of wife's residence, where he accepted benefits from separation agreement, which was incorporated in decree, for nearly three years. Black v. De Black, 1 P.3d 1244,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Hensley v. Hensley, 896 P.2d 115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Ellison v. Walter ex rel. Walter, 834 P.2d 680,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty to recognize and give effect to decrees of divorce rendered in other states, or in foreign country, as affected by lack of domicile at divorce forum, 1 ALR2d 1385, 27 ALR2d 1303.

Length or duration of domicil, as distinguished from fact of domicil, as a jurisdictional matter, 2 ALR2d 291.

Validity of statute permitting granting of divorces to nonresidents, 3 ALR2d 666.

Jurisdiction as affected by change of residence pendente lite, 7 ALR2d 1414.

Residence or domicil, for purposes of divorce action, of one in armed forces, 21 ALR2d 1163.

Nature and location of one's business or calling as element in determining domicil in divorce cases, 36 ALR2d 756.

What constitutes residence or domicil within state by citizen of another country for purpose of jurisdiction in divorce, 51 ALR3d 223.

Validity of statute imposing durational residency requirements for divorce applicants, 57 ALR3d 221.

§ 20-2-108.
Action conducted as civil action.

Actions to annul or affirm a marriage, for a divorce or to establish any order regarding the maintenance or custody of children shall be conducted in the same manner as civil actions, and the court may decree costs and enforce its decree as in other cases, except a divorce decree shall not be entered less than twenty (20) days from the date the complaint is filed.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1576; R.S. 1899, § 2993; C.S. 1910, § 3929; C.S. 1920, § 4995; R.S. 1931, § 35-113; C.S. 1945, § 3-5911; W.S. 1957, § 20-50; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-108

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.

Divorce deemed civil action. —

Proceedings for divorce are not listed in Wyoming statutes as “special proceedings” but as an action to which general rules of equity are ordinarily applied, though in some respects limited by statute. Book v. Book, 59 Wyo. 423, 141 P.2d 546,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1943).

Suit by minor. —

While commencement of a suit by a minor in his own name is an irregularity, it may be cured by amendment of petition. Urbach v. Urbach, 52 Wyo. 207, 73 P.2d 953,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1937).

§ 20-2-109.
Restraining orders concerning property or pecuniary interests during litigation.

If after filing a complaint for divorce it appears probable to the court that either party is about to do any act that would defeat or render less effective any order which the court might ultimately make concerning property or pecuniary interests, an order shall be made for the prevention thereof and such process issued as the court deems necessary or proper.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 1582; R.S. 1899, § 2999; C.S. 1910, § 3935; C.S. 1920, § 5001; R.S. 1931, § 35-119; C.S. 1945, § 3-5917; W.S. 1957, § 20-56; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-109

.

Coverage of bond. —

Bond given in action of divorce, to secure dissolution of order restraining alienation of property and also conditioned upon payment of temporary alimony, does not cover payment of permanent alimony as well. Snow v. Duxstad, 23 Wyo. 82, 147 P. 174,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1915).

Bond, given to secure dissolution of order restraining disposition of property and to secure payment of alimony pending suit, covers alimony accruing during the period between dismissal of plaintiff's action and disposition of her appeal. Snow v. Duxstad, 23 Wyo. 82, 147 P. 174,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1915).

Release of surety. —

Dismissal of action for divorce by trial court did not release surety from his liability on a bond executed to procure the release of defendant in such action from a temporary restraining order. Snow v. Duxstad, 23 Wyo. 82, 147 P. 174,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1915).

Return by surety on bond of money deposited with him by his principal to secure his liability does not release him from liability on reversal of judgment of dismissal of action in which bond was given. Snow v. Duxstad, 23 Wyo. 82, 147 P. 174,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Spouse's dissipation of marital assets prior to divorce as factor in divorce court's determination of property division, 41 ALR4th 416.

Divorce and separation: effect of court order prohibiting sale or transfer of property on party's right to change beneficiary of insurance policy, 68 ALR4th 929.

§ 20-2-110.
Restraint during litigation.

After the filing of a complaint for divorce or to annul a marriage, on the petition of either party the court may prohibit the other party from imposing any restraint upon the petitioner’s personal liberty during the pendency of the action.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 40, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1577; R.S. 1899, § 2994; C.S. 1910, § 3930; C.S. 1920, § 4996; R.S. 1931, § 35-114; C.S. 1945, § 3-5912; W.S. 1957, § 20-57; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-2-110

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 3.